tests/test_out.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY -ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZčČžŽěĚšŠabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzЈјЦцУуКкЕеНнГгШшЗзХхФфЫыВвАаПпРрОоЛлДдЖжЄєЧчСсМмИиТтЬьБбЊњЉљđĐśŚęĘŕŔřŔťŤųŲåÅďĎľĽźŹćĆńŃȯȮėĖòÒèÈ

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS -

FLAG long

COMPOUNDBEGIN xB
COMPOUNDEND xE
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG xP
ONLYINCOMPOUND xO

ICONV 4
ICONV њ нј
ICONV љ лј
ICONV нь нј
ICONV ль лј

MAP 24
MAP ćčc
MAP ęeěėèé
MAP ųu
MAP åa
MAP oȯòó
MAP đ(dž)
MAP ľlłĺ
MAP nňń
MAP rŕř
MAP tť
MAP dď
MAP sś
MAP źz
MAP иі
MAP ђ(дж)
MAP ћ(ч)
MAP јй
MAP я(ја)
MAP ю(ју)
MAP ї(ји)
MAP эе
MAP ј'ъ
MAP ъа
MAP ъо

REP 78
REP e ě
REP e y
REP i y
REP y i
REP e je
REP y e
REP l lj
REP s ss
REP ě e
REP ljenje jenje
REP tuty tutoj
REP j ju
REP og ogo
REP v u
REP ě je
REP je ě
REP y j
REP jedny jedin
REP oro ra
REP olo la
REP sistemom sistemoju
REP gleda gledě
REP gleda gledi
REP krov krv
REP česky čsky
REP gde kde
REP nemečesk němečsk
REP daby da_by
REP lej ljev
REP sa _se
REP sja _se
REP nedolgo ne_dolgo
REP ii iji
REP sofii zofiji
REP svjat svet
REP ogo ojego
REP stč šč
REP št šč
REP aja ajuči
REP е є
REP е ы
REP и ы
REP ы и
REP е је
REP ы е
REP л лј
REP с сс
REP є е
REP лјенје јенје
REP туты тутој
REP ј ју
REP ог ого
REP в у
REP є је
REP је є
REP ы ј
REP једны једин
REP оро ра
REP оло ла
REP системом системоју
REP гледа гледє
REP гледа гледи
REP кров крв
REP ческы чскы
REP где кде
REP немеческ нємечск
REP дабы да_бы
REP леј љев
REP са _се
REP сја _се
REP недолго не_долго
REP ии ији
REP софии зофији
REP свјат свет
REP ого ојего
REP стч шч
REP шт шч
REP аја ајучи

PFX zz Y 1
PFX zz 0 naj .

PFX zx Y 1
PFX zx 0 нај .

SFX AA Y 4
SFX AA y ies [^aeiou]y
SFX AA 0 s [aeiou]y
SFX AA 0 es [sxzh]
SFX AA 0 s [^sxzhy]

SFX AB Y 1
SFX AB 0 's .

SFX AC Y 3
SFX AC e ion e
SFX AC y ication y
SFX AC 0 en [^ey]

SFX AD Y 4
SFX AD 0 r e
SFX AD y ier [^aeiou]y
SFX AD 0 er [aeiou]y
SFX AD 0 er [^ey]

SFX AE Y 2
SFX AE e ing e
SFX AE 0 ing [^e]

SFX AF Y 4
SFX AF 0 d e
SFX AF y ied [^aeiou]y
SFX AF 0 ed [^ey]
SFX AF 0 ed [aeiou]y

SFX AG Y 4
SFX AG 0 st e
SFX AG y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX AG 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX AG 0 est [^ey]

SFX AH Y 2
SFX AH y ieth y
SFX AH 0 th [^y]

SFX AI Y 4
SFX AI 0 rs e
SFX AI y iers [^aeiou]y
SFX AI 0 ers [aeiou]y
SFX AI 0 ers [^ey]

SFX AJ Y 2
SFX AJ e ings e
SFX AJ 0 ings [^e]

SFX AK Y 1
SFX AK 0 ly .

SFX AL Y 2
SFX AL e ive e
SFX AL 0 ive [^e]

SFX AM Y 3
SFX AM e ions e
SFX AM y ications y
SFX AM 0 ens [^ey]

SFX AN Y 3
SFX AN 0 able [^aeiou]
SFX AN 0 able ee
SFX AN e able [^aeiou]e

SFX AO Y 3
SFX AO y iness [^aeiou]y
SFX AO 0 ness [aeiou]y
SFX AO 0 ness [^y]

SFX AP Y 1
SFX AP 0 ment .

PFX AQ Y 1
PFX AQ 0 un .

PFX AR Y 1
PFX AR 0 in .

PFX AS Y 1
PFX AS 0 dis .

PFX AT Y 1
PFX AT 0 re .

PFX AU Y 1
PFX AU 0 de .

PFX AV Y 1
PFX AV 0 pro .

PFX AW Y 1
PFX AW 0 con .
